Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0301

Authority to amend organic rules.

(1) A limited cooperative association may amend its organic rules under this chapter for any lawful purpose. In addition, the initial board of directors may amend the bylaws of an association under RCW 23.100.0203.

(2) Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a member does not have a vested property right resulting from any provision in the organic rules, including a provision relating to the management, control, capital structure, distribution, entitlement, purpose, or duration of the limited cooperative association.

[ 2019 c 37 s 301.]